Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1911
Sources of radiation, defined.

Sources of radiation means any radioactive material, any radiation-generating equipment, or any device or equipment emitting or capable of emitting radiation or radioactive material.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 649.